Maine, session 132, LD715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§2-D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S,
§4, is further amended to read:
2-D. Credit in 2022 and after. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022,
a resident individual is allowed a credit against the taxes imposed under this Part equal to
the amount by which the benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 4% of the resident
individual's income, except that, for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a
resident individual who is 65 years of age or older with an annual income at or below
$36,000 is allowed a credit against the taxes imposed under this Part equal to the amount
by which the benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 3% of the resident individual's
annual income. The credit may not exceed $1,000 for resident individuals under 65 years
of age as of the last day of the taxable year or, for tax years beginning before January 1,
2024, $1,500 for resident individuals 65 years of age and older as of the last day of the
taxable year. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, for resident individuals
65 years of age and older, the credit may not exceed $2,000. In the case of married
individuals filing a joint return, only one spouse is required to be 65 years of age or older
to qualify for the credit applicable to individuals who are 65 years of age and older as
established by this subsection or to qualify for the $1,500 or $2,000 credit limitation.
Married taxpayers filing separate returns do not qualify for the credit under this section.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5403, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
S, §5, is amended to read:
6. Property tax fairness credit. For the property tax fairness credit:
A. Beginning in 2018 and each year thereafter, by the benefit base amounts in section
5219‑KK, subsection 1, paragraph A‑1, subparagraphs (1) to (3), except that for the
purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-
of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period
ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer
Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2017; and
B. Beginning in 2024 and each year thereafter, by the benefit base amount in section
5219‑KK, subsection 1, paragraph A‑1, subparagraph (4), except that for the purposes
of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402, subsection 1‑B, the "cost-of-living
adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June
30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for
the 12-month period ending June 30, 2023; and
C. Beginning in 2026 and each year thereafter, by the income amount at or below
which a resident individual who is 65 years of age or older is allowed the credit
provided in section 5219-KK, subsection 2-D that is equal to the amount by which the
benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 3% of the resident individual's annual
income, except that for the purposes of this subsection, notwithstanding section 5402,
subsection 1-B, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the Chained Consumer Price Index
for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by
the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2025;
Page 1 - 132LR1257(01)